Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4126.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 319.883 to
319.946.
SECTION 2. (1) Not later than September 15 of each even-numbered year, the Depart-
ment of Transportation shall submit a report, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to transportation, that recommends
a rate for the per-mile road usage charge that would sustainably raise the revenue necessary
to maintain the public highways of this state.
(2) The report must include:
(a) The total estimated cost for maintenance and preservation of Oregon’s transportation
system, including for local systems; and
(b) An estimate of the total vehicle miles driven on the public highways of this state
based on the most recently available data on vehicle miles traveled, set forth separately ac-
cording to the following weight table:
(A) Vehicles weighing 10,000 pounds or less.
(B) Vehicles weighing more than 10,000 pounds and not more than 12,000 pounds.
(C) Vehicles weighing more than 12,000 pounds and not more than 14,000 pounds.
(D) Vehicles weighing more than 14,000 pounds and not more than 16,000 pounds.
(E) Vehicles weighing more than 16,000 pounds and not more than 18,000 pounds.
(F) Vehicles weighing more than 18,000 pounds and not more than 20,000 pounds.
(G) Vehicles weighing more than 20,000 pounds and not more than 22,000 pounds.
(H) Vehicles weighing more than 22,000 pounds and not more than 24,000 pounds.
(I) Vehicles weighing more than 24,000 pounds and not more than 26,000 pounds.
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 110

A-Eng. HB 4126
(J) Vehicles weighing more than 26,000 pounds.
(3) For purposes of subsection (2)(a) of this section, the department shall establish met-
rics by which maintenance and preservation needs are evaluated and reported, including but
not limited to:
(a) The desired pavement condition index for each road type;
(b) Striping and painting standards;
(c) Bridge replacement timelines; and
(d) The department’s administrative costs associated with these maintenance and pres-
ervation needs.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding the due date for submission of reports under section 2 (1)
of this 2026 Act, the Department of Transportation shall submit the first report that is due
after the effective date of this 2026 Act not later than January 31, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[2]